hr-HR: Kompatibilan oblik štapa: I-profil; Pravokutno; Okruglo; Kvadratno; Ostalo
de: Kompatible Mastform: Doppel-T-Träger; Rechteckig; Rund; Quadratisch; Sonstige
el: Συμβατές διαστάσεις στύλου: Διατομή I; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
tr: Uyumlu direk şekli: I-kiriş; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kare; Diğer
it: Shapesdi pali compatibili: Trave ad H; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Quadrato; Altro
ru: Совместимая форма стойки: Двутавр; Прямоугольная; Круглая; Квадратная; Другое
ja: 互換性のあるポールShapes: Iビーム; 長方形; 円形; 正方形; その他
fr: Forme de poteau compatible: En I; Rectangulaire; Rond; Carré; Autre
cs: Kompatibilní tvar tyče: I profil; Obdélníkový; Kulatý; Čtvercový; Jiné
ko: 호환 폴 형상: I빔; 직사각형; 원형; 정사각형; 기타
nl: Compatibele paal vorm: I-profiel; Rechthoekig; Rond; Vierkant; Overig
th: รูปทรงเสาที่เข้ากันได้: I-beam; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; กลม; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; อื่นๆ
fi: Yhteensopiva pylvään muoto: I-palkki; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Neliö; Muu
es: Forma de postes compatible: Viga en I; Rectangular; Redondo; Cuadrado; Otro
lt-LT: Suderinama stulpo forma: Dvitėjinė sija; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Kvadratinis; Kita
en: Compatible pole shape: I-beam; Rectangular; Round; Square; Other
pt-PT: Forma de poste compatível: Viga em I; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
sk-SK: Kompatibilný tvar tyče: Profil I; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Štvorcový; Iné
vi: Hình dạng cột tương thích: Chữ I; Hình chữ nhật; Tròn; Vuông; Khác
da: Kompatibel stangform: I-bjælke; Rektangulær; Rund; Kvadratisk; Andet
pl: Kompatybilny kształt słupka: Dwuteownik; Prostokątny; Okrągły; Kwadratowy; Inne
bg-BG: Съвместима форма на стълб: I-образен профил; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Квадратна; Друго
zh-CN: 适配立柱形状: 工字型; 矩形; 圆形; 方形; 其他
sl-SI: Združljiva oblika palic: I-profil; Pravokotno; Okroglo; Kvadratno; Drugo
zh-TW: 相容桿件形狀: 工字樑; 長方形; 圓形; 方形; 其他
pt-BR: Forma de poste compatível: Viga em I; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
ro-RO: Formă de stâlp compatibilă: Profil I; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Pătrat; Altele
sv: Kompatibel stolpform: I-balk; Rektangulär; Rund; Fyrkantig; Övrigt
hu: Kompatibilis rúdformák: I-gerenda; Téglalap alakú; Kerek; Négyzet alakú; Egyéb
nb: Kompatible stolpeformer: I-bjelke; Rektangulær; Rund; Kvadratisk; Annet